District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-303.10

Duties of Mayor.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 309, 42 DCR 6748
redesignated § 310, June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(10), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.9.
2001 Ed., § 46-303.09

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote the section.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-303.10 has been recodified as § 46-303.11 by D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(10).

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 310 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).